Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1054.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Use and Maintenance of Opioid Antagonists.--(a) Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this section, the department, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall develop a policy requiring each school entity offering grade nine, ten, eleven or twelve to provide and maintain onsite opioid antagonists in each school facility attended by students. The policy developed under this section:(1) Shall include guidelines that a school entity may follow when responding to a suspected opioid overdose.1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) Shall only require an individual who volunteers to be designated by a school entity as the individual responsible for storing, maintaining or administering an opioid antagonist to complete training, as provided under subsection (c).(3) Shall provide the quantities and types of opioid antagonists to be maintained by each school entity.(4) Shall provide a list of approved training programs an individual may complete to be considered qualified in the administration of opioid antagonists.(b) A school nurse, school employe or other individual may receive training in the administration of opioid antagonists provided by the Department of Health or another approved training program.(c) If a school employe or other individual who is not a health care practitioner volunteers to be designated by a school entity as the individual responsible for storing, maintaining or administering an opioid antagonist, the employe or other individual shall receive biennial training regarding storage, maintenance and administration of an opioid antagonist to a student or a staff member experiencing a suspected opioid overdose. For a school employe, the training shall:(1) Be conducted during the employe's paid working hours or, if the training is conducted outside the employe's paid working hours, the employe shall be paid for completing the training.(2) Confer credit towards continuing professional education requirements for employes subject to section 1205.2.(d) To treat a case of suspected opioid overdose in a school facility, a school nurse, school employe or other individual may administer an opioid antagonist to a student or staff member experiencing a suspected opioid overdose.20250SB1054PN1245 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) For the duration of each school day, a school entity shall ensure that at least one (1) school nurse, school employe or other individual who has been trained to administer an opioid antagonist is present on site at each school facility attended by students.(f) Opioid antagonists shall be maintained at each school facility attended by students in a safe and secure location.(g) This section shall not be construed as creating any liability for or a cause of action against a school entity or its officers or employes.(h) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity), 8337 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to drug or alcohol abuse) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a school nurse, school employe or other individual who administers an opioid antagonist to an individual experiencing a suspected opioid overdose at a school facility.(i) In complying with the policy developed under subsection (a), a school entity may use funds obtained through Federal, State or local grants or other money designated for student health and safety or opioid prevention and abatement, including the following sources:(1) The School Safety and Security Grant Program under section 1306-B.(2) State appropriations made from the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account under section 1792-A.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."(3) Opioid settlement funds received by county, municipal or 20250SB1054PN1245 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local governments and agencies, including district attorneys.(j) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Opioid antagonist" means a drug or device approved by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid overdose, including naloxone hydrochloride, also known as Narcan or naloxone, or other similarly acting drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose."Opioid overdose" means an acute medical condition, including severe physical illness, coma, mania, hysteria or death, resulting from the consumption or use of one or more natural, semi-synthetic or synthetic opioid causing an adverse reaction. A patient's condition shall be deemed to be an opioid overdose if a prudent person, possessing an average knowledge of medicine and health, would reasonably believe that the condition is in fact an opioid overdose and requires immediate medical attention."School day" means the hours between the morning opening of a school building and the afternoon dismissal of students on a day which classes are in session."School entity" means a public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1054PN1245 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930